hr-HR: Sportska oprema > Atletika > Umjetničko klizanje i hokej > Dijelovi i pribor za klizanje na ledu > Oštrilice za klizaljke: Strojevi za oštrenje klizaljki; Kotači i prstenovi za oštrenje klizaljki; Kamenje za brušenje klizaljki i alati za uklanjanje tragova
th: อุปกรณ์กีฬา > การกีฬา > สเกตลีลาและฮอกกี้ > ชิ้นส่วนและอุปกรณ์สเก็ตน้ำแข็ง > เครื่องเหลารองเท้าสเกตน้ำแข็ง: เครื่องลับใบมีดรองเท้าสเกตน้ำแข็ง; ล้อและหินลับใบมีดรองเท้าสเกตน้ำแข็ง; หินลับและเครื่องมือลบคมใบมีดรองเท้าสเกต
zh-CN: 体育用品 > 田径 > 花样滑冰与冰球 > 冰刀/冰鞋零件/配件 > 冰刀磨刀器: 冰刀磨削机; 冰刀磨削轮与磨环; 冰刀磨刀石与去毛刺工具
vi: Dụng cụ thể thao > Điền kinh > Trượt băng nghệ thuật và khúc côn cầu > Phụ tùng và phụ kiện giày trượt băng > Máy mài giày trượt băng: Máy mài giày trượt băng; Bánh xe và vòng mài giày trượt băng; Đá mài và dụng cụ gọt bavia giày trượt
ko: 스포츠용품 > 운동 > 피겨 스케이팅/하키 > 스케이트 부품/부대용품 > 스케이트날 연마기: 아이스 스케이트 연마 머신; 아이스 스케이트 연마 휠 및 링; 스케이트 호닝 스톤 및 디버링 도구
nl: Sportartikelen > Lichaamssporten > Kunstrijden en ijshockey > Schaatsonderdelen en -accessoires > Slijpstenen: Slijpmachines voor schaatsen; Slijpschijven en -ringen voor schaatsen; Wetstenen en afbraamgereedschap voor schaatsen
fr: Équipements sportifs > Divers sports > Patinage artistique et hockey > Pièces et accessoires de patins à glace > Affûteuses de patins à glace: Affûteuses pour patins à glace; Meules et anneaux d'affûtage pour patins à glace; Pierres à aiguiser et outils d'ébarbage pour patins
zh-TW: 體育用品 > 競技體育 > 花式滑冰/冰上曲棍球 > 溜冰鞋零件/配件 > 溜冰鞋刀磨刀器: 溜冰鞋磨刀機; 溜冰鞋磨刀輪與磨刀環; 溜冰鞋磨刀石與除毛刺工具
tr: Spor Malzemeleri > Spor Ekipmanları > Artistik Paten ve Hokey > Buz Pateni Parçaları ve Aksesuarları > Buz Pateni Bileyicileri: Buz pateni bileme makineleri; Buz pateni bileme taşları ve halkaları; Paten bileme taşları ve çapak alma aletleri
lt-LT: Sporto prekės > Atletika > Dailusis čiuožimas ir ledo ritulys > Pačiūžų dalys ir priedai > Pačiūžų galąstuvai: Pačiūžų galandimo staklės; Pačiūžų galandimo ratukai ir žiedai; Pačiūžų galandimo akmenys ir užvartų šalinimo įrankiai
sk-SK: Športový tovar > Atletika > Krasokorčuľovanie a hokej > Časti a príslušenstvo pre korčule > Brúsky na korčule: Stroje na brúsenie korčúľ; Kolieska a krúžky na brúsenie korčúľ; Brúsne kamene a nástroje na brúsenie korčúľ
pt-PT: Artigos de desporto > Atividade desportiva > Hóquei e patinagem artística > Acessórios e peças para patins de gelo > Afiadores de patins de gelo: Máquinas de afiação de patins no gelo; Mós e anéis de afiação de patins no gelo; Pedras de amolar e ferramentas de rebarbar patins
da: Sportsartikler > Atletik > Kunstskøjteløb og ishockey > Dele og tilbehør til skøjter > Isskøjteslibere: Skøjteslibemaskiner; Slibeskiver og -ringe til skøjter; Slibesten og afgratningsværktøj til skøjter
hu: Sportszerek > Atlétika > Műkorcsolya és jégkorong > Jégkorcsolya-alkatrészek és -kiegészítők > Jégkorcsolya-élezők: Korcsolyaélező gépek; Korcsolyaélező korongok és gyűrűk; Korcsolya fenőkövek és sorjátlanító eszközök
ru: Спортивные товары > Соревновательный спорт > Хоккей и фигурное катание > Детали и аксессуары для коньков > Инструменты для заточки коньков: Станки для заточки коньков; Заточные круги и кольца для коньков; Оселки и инструменты для снятия заусенцев (коньки)
it: Articoli sportivi > Sport > Pattinaggio di figura e hockey > Componenti e accessori per pattinaggio su ghiaccio > Affilatori pattini da ghiaccio: Macchine affilapattini da ghiaccio; Mole e anelli per affilapattini da ghiaccio; Pietre per affilatura e sbavatori per pattini
pt-BR: Artigos esportivos > Artigos para prática de esportes > Patinação artística e hóquei > Peças e acessórios para patins para gelo > Afiadores de patins para gelo: Máquinas de afiar patins de gelo; Rodas e anéis de afiação de patins de gelo; Pedras de afiar e ferramentas de rebarbação para patins
pl: Sprzęt sportowy > Sport > Łyżwiarstwo figurowe i hokej > Części i akcesoria do łyżew > Ostrzałki do łyżew: Maszyny do ostrzenia łyżew; Tarcze i pierścienie do ostrzenia łyżew; Osełki i narzędzia do gratowania płóz łyżew
el: Αθλητικά είδη > Αθλητισμός > Καλλιτεχνικό πατινάζ & χόκεϊ > Ανταλλακτικά & αξεσουάρ πατινάζ πάγου > Τροχιστές παγοπέδιλων: Μηχανήματα ακονίσματος παγοπέδιλων; Τροχοί και δακτύλιοι ακονίσματος παγοπέδιλων; Πέτρες ακονίσματος και εργαλεία λείανσης παγοπέδιλων
es: Equipamiento deportivo > Equipamiento para atletismo > Patinaje artístico y hockey > Accesorios para patines de hielo > Afiladores de patines de hielo: Máquinas de afilar patines sobre hielo; Anillos y ruedas para afilado de patines sobre hielo; Piedras de afilar y herramientas de desbarbado para patines
en: Sporting Goods > Athletics > Figure Skating & Hockey > Ice Skate Parts & Accessories > Ice Skate Sharpeners: Ice Skate Sharpening Machines; Ice Skate Sharpening Wheels & Rings; Skate Honing Stones & Deburring Tools
cs: Sportovní potřeby > Atletické sporty > Krasobruslení a hokej > Díly a příslušenství k bruslím > Brusky na brusle: Brusky na brusle; Brusné kotouče a kroužky na brusle; Brousky a nástroje na odstranění otřepů na brusle
bg-BG: Спортни стоки > Спортни занимания > Фигурно пързаляне и хокей > Части и аксесоари за кънки на лед > Точила за кънки на лед: Машини за заточване на кънки; Колела и пръстени за заточване на кънки; Камъни за заточване и инструменти за почисване на кънки
fi: Urheilutarvikkeet > Urheilu > Taitoluistelu ja jääkiekko > Luistinten osat ja tarvikkeet > Luistinten teroituskoneet: Luistimenteroituskoneet; Luistimenteroituslaikat ja -renkaat; Luistinten hiomakivet ja jäysteenpoistotyökalut
de: Sportartikel > Athletik > Eiskunstlauf & Hockey > Schlittschuhzubehör > Schlittschuhschleifer: Schlittschuh-Schleifmaschinen; Schleifscheiben & Ringe für Schlittschuhe; Abziehsteine & Entgratwerkzeuge für Schlittschuhe
sv: Sportartiklar > Idrott och sport > Konståkning och hockey > Delar och tillbehör för skridskoåkning > Skridskoskärpare: Slipmaskiner för skridskor; Slipskivor och ringar för skridskoslipning; Brynstenar och avgradningsverktyg för skridskor
sl-SI: Športna oprema > Šport > Umetnostno drsanje in hokej > Deli in dodatki za drsalke > Brusilci za drsalke: Stroji za brušenje drsalk; Kolesca in obroči za brušenje drsalk; Kamni za brušenje drsalk in orodja za odstranjevanje grobih robov
nb: Sportsutstyr > Friidrett > Kunstløp og hockey > Deler og tilbehør for kunstløp > Skøyteslipere: Skøyteslipemaskiner; Slipeskiver og -ringer for skøyter; Brynesteiner og avgradingsverktøy for skøyter
ro-RO: Articole sportive > Atletism > Patinaj artistic și hochei > Piese și accesorii pentru patinaj pe gheață > Dispozitive de ascuțire patine: Mașini de ascuțit patine; Discuri și inele de ascuțit patine; Pietre de honuire și instrumente de debavurare pentru patine
ja: スポーツ用品 > スポーツ競技 > フィギュアスケート・アイスホッケー用品 > アイススケート靴パーツ・関連用品 > アイススケート用研磨機: アイススケート研磨機; アイススケート研磨用ホイール・リング; スケート用ホーニング砥石・バリ取りツール